Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 9
ESTABLISHMENT OF PUBLIC AUTHORITIES
BY MUNICIPALITIES - ENERGY RESOURCES

31-25-901. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that decreasing supplies of energy resources and the increasing cost thereof is causing severe financial burdens and constitutes a threat to the health and welfare of the citizens of this state and that it is in the public interest that the development of alternative sources of energy proceed expeditiously to avert energy shortages and threats to the public health and welfare.

To encourage the use and development by municipalities of alternate energy resources in the form of unconventional gas supplies for the use of the inhabitants of the municipalities of this state and for all citizens as alternate fuels for use by municipal utilities and others, the powers of municipalities are hereby expanded to authorize the formation of authorities for the purpose of financing municipal operations for the exploration, development, and production of unconventional gas, the use thereof for the purposes of municipal utilities, and the marketing and sale thereof to others.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire part added, p. 658, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-902. Duties of authority - development and financing of unconventional gas supplies.

An authority formed pursuant to this part 9, referred to in this part 9 as the "authority", shall be known as a municipal energy finance authority. Its duties shall include the financing of municipal operations for the exploration, development, and production of unconventional gas, as defined in this section, for the purposes specified in section 31-25-901.

For the purposes of this part 9, "unconventional gases" means gases which are predominantly methane, not obtained from ordinary, porous sands; and which generally are said to be in tight sands and shales where permeability is low, in coal beds where pressure is low, and in geopressured sediments, or gas from all sources other than sandstone or limestone with permeability less than one millidarcy. "Unconventional gases" also includes gases which are predominantly methane obtained from or in connection with wastewater treatment operations.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire part added, p. 659, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-903. Formation of authority by municipality.

The governing board of any municipality, referred to in this part 9 as the "governing body", may create and establish a municipal energy finance authority by the passage of an ordinance therefor. The authority shall have all the powers provided in this part 9 that are authorized by the ordinance, or any amendment thereto, authorizing such authority. When established, the authority shall be a body corporate, and capable of being a party to suits, proceedings, and contracts, the same as municipalities in this state. Any such authority may be dissolved by ordinance of the governing body, if there are no outstanding bonds or other obligations of the authority or if adequate provision for the payment of such bonds or obligations has been provided.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire part added, p. 659, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-904. Board - membership - term of office.

The affairs of the authority shall be under the direct supervision and control of a board, which is referred to in this part 9 as the "board", consisting of five members appointed by the governing body.

The board shall be constituted as follows:

At least one member shall be a member of the governing body, appointed to serve at the pleasure of the governing body.

Two members shall be appointed for terms expiring June 30 of the year following the date of the ordinance adopted by the governing body establishing the authority.

Two members shall be appointed for terms expiring June 30 of the second year following the date of the ordinance adopted by the governing body establishing the authority.

A member shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and qualified. After the terms of the initial members of the board have expired, the terms of all members, except any member who is a member of the governing body, shall expire four years from the expiration date of the terms of their predecessors. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired term. In any municipality in which the charter provides that the appointive authority is the mayor, the mayor shall make appointments to the board.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire part added, p. 659, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-905. Board membership - qualifications - nominations - rules - removal.

Each appointed member of the board, except any member from the governing body, shall be a registered elector of the municipality. No officer or employee of the municipality where the authority is located, other than any appointee from the governing body, shall be eligible for appointment to the board. Within thirty days after the occurrence of a vacancy, the governing body, except as provided in section 31-25-904 (3), shall appoint a successor.

Before assuming the duties of the office, each appointed member shall qualify by taking and subscribing to the oath of office required of officials of the municipality.

The board shall adopt and promulgate rules governing its procedure, including election of officers, and said rules shall be filed in the office of the municipal clerk. The board shall hold regular meetings in the manner provided in the rules of the board. Special meetings may be held when called in the manner provided in the rules of the board. All meetings of the board shall be open to the public except those dealing with land acquisition or sales, personnel matters, or legal matters.

After notice and an opportunity to be heard, an appointed member of the board may be removed for cause by the governing body.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire part added, p. 660, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 332, § 98, effective July 1.

31-25-906. Powers - duties of board.

Subject to the provisions of this part 9 and subject to other applicable provisions of law, the board shall have all powers customarily vested in the board of directors of a corporation. It shall appoint a director, who shall recommend the hiring of such staff as may be required. The board shall exercise supervisory control over the activities of the director and the staff of the authority in carrying out the functions authorized by this part 9.

In addition to the powers granted by subsection (1) of this section, the board, acting on behalf of the authority, shall also have the power:

To conduct investigations for the purposes of locating reserves of unconventional gas and the means and methods of exploring, developing, and producing such gas;

To take over, by purchase, lease, or otherwise, any project undertaken by any government or by the municipality; except that such takeover shall not interfere with the normal use of any real property, or other property appurtenant thereto, which is devoted or dedicated to a public utility use;

To act as agent for the federal government in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation, or management of the project or any part thereof.

To the extent authorized by the governing body, the board may provide, out of project funds, for the compensation and the reimbursement of actual and necessary expenses of the board of the authority.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire part added, p. 660, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-907. Powers of authority to effect purposes specified.

To accomplish the purposes specified in sections 31-25-901 and 31-25-902, authorities are granted the following additional powers:

To acquire, hold, use, transfer, and convey any real property or any interest therein, in fee or a leasehold interest, for purposes of initiating projects involving unconventional gas exploration, production, and development;

To engage in any and all activities respecting the exploration, development, production, distribution, marketing, and sale of unconventional gas to any person or public or private entity or for municipal uses;

To issue revenue bonds authorized by action of the governing body, without the approval of the qualified electors of the municipality, for purposes of financing the exploration, development, production, distribution, and marketing of unconventional gas.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire part added, p. 660, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-908. Provisions relating to revenue bonds.

Revenue bonds issued by the authority shall be issued in the manner provided in part 4 of article 35 of this title for the issuance of revenue bonds by municipalities; except that such revenue bonds may be sold in one or more series at par, or below or above par, at public or private sale, in such manner and for such price as the authority, in its discretion, shall determine.

Revenue bonds issued by the authority and interest coupons, if any, appurtenant thereto shall never constitute the debt or indebtedness of the municipality within the meaning of any provision or limitation of the state constitution, statutes, or home rule charter and shall not constitute nor give rise to a pecuniary liability of the municipality or a charge against its general credit or taxing powers.

Revenue bonds and the income issued by the authority therefrom are exempt from taxation, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

Revenue bonds issued by the authority shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire part added, p. 661, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-909. Contracts with federal government.

In addition to the powers conferred upon the authority by section 31-25-907, the authority, with regard to its relations with the federal government, is empowered:

To borrow money from the federal government to finance any project and to borrow from private sources when such borrowing is guaranteed by the federal government;

To take over any land offered by the federal government for the construction of a project; and

To take over, lease, or manage any project so constructed or owned by the federal government and, to that end, to enter into any such contracts, leases, or other agreements as the federal government may require in such connection; except that such takeover shall not interfere with the normal use of any real property, or other property appurtenant thereto, which is devoted or dedicated to a public utility use.

Such contract, lease, or other agreements may provide that the federal government has the right to supervise and approve the construction, maintenance, and operation of such project.

It is the purpose and intent of this section to authorize such authority to accept the cooperation of the federal government in the construction, maintenance, and operation and in the financing of the construction of any project which the authority is empowered to undertake. Such authority has the full power to do all things necessary in order to secure such aid, assistance, and cooperation.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire part added, p. 661, § 1, effective July 1.

31-25-910. Colorado energy research institute - report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 80:

Entire part added, p. 662, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1985. (See L. 80, p. 662.)